Massachusetts, session 194th, H5515.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding clause Seventeenth D of section 5 of chapter 59 of the 
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the town of Shrewsbury may 
adjust the eligibility factors for determining an exemption for real property under said clause 
Seventeenth D by: (i) increasing the total whole estate limit, real and personal, for such an 
exemption to not more than $61,490; provided, that said limit shall be increased annually by an 
amount equal to the increase in the Consumer Price Index published by the United States 
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics for such year, pursuant to clause Seventeenth E 
of said section 5 of said chapter 59; and (ii) reducing the minimum age of eligibility for such an 
exemption from 70 to 65. 
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding clause Forty-first C of section 5 of chapter 59 of the 
General Laws or any general or special law to the contrary, the town of Shrewsbury may adjust 

of 2 12 the eligibility factors for determining an exemption for real property under said clause Forty-first 
C by: (i) increasing the maximum allowable gross receipts from all sources in the preceding year 
to an amount not exceeding $29,879 for a single person, or $44,818 for a married person 
determined by the gross receipts of both spouses for the preceding year; and (ii) increasing the 
total allowable value of a person’s whole estate, real and personal, to a maximum of $61,490, or 
$84,549 for a married person, to be increased annually by an amount equal to the increase in the 
Consumer Price Index published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor 
Statistics for such year, pursuant to clause Forty-first D of said section 5 of said Chapter 59. 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.